Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-113
City council; powers; armory; establishment; lease to state authorized.

In each city of the metropolitan class, the city council shall have power by ordinance to erect, establish, and maintain an armory in such city, and may rent or lease such armory to the State of Nebraska for the purpose of housing the National Guard and State Guard of the state, or any unit thereof, under such terms and conditions as the city council may deem proper.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. I, § 12 1/2, p. 410;

C.S.1922, § 3500;

C.S.1929, § 14-113;

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 10, § 3, p. 73;

Laws 1941, c. 130, § 9, p. 495;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-113;

R.S.1943, § 14-113;

Laws 1972, LB 1046, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 22.
July 21, 2022